District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Solar Shade Expansion Amendment Act of 2025”.


Sec. 2. The Clean and Affordable Energy Amendment Act of 2008, effective October 22,
2008, (D.C. Law 17-250; D.C. Official Code § 8–1773.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 218 to read as follows:
“Sec. 218. Solar canopy feasibility study; capital funding requirements and grantmaking
authority; updated study.
“(a)(1) By January 1, 2026, DOEE shall conduct and publish a study analyzing the
feasibility of installing solar canopies to expand solar energy generation while providing shade in
at least 20 locations in the District, including at least 5 of each of the following:
“(A) Buildings or land owned by the District, such as recreation centers,
parks, pools, playgrounds, parking lots, and parking decks, selected after consultation with the
Department of General Services and the Department of Parks and Recreation;
“(B) District roadways, sidewalks, bike lanes, and cycletracks, selected
after consultation with the District Department of Transportation; and
“(C) Private property, such as parking decks, surface parking lots, and
common areas in commercial buildings and residential buildings, selected after consultation with
the Department of Buildings.
“(2) The study shall:
“(A) Compare, between various locations in the District, the:
“(i) Potential to generate solar energy;
“(ii) Desirability or benefits of providing shade;
“(iii) Costs of installing solar canopies; and
“(iv) Difficulty of installing solar canopies, including any legal or
administrative barriers unrelated to cost;


“(B) Recommend settings, based on the factors described in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph, where the installation of solar canopies should be prioritized; and
“(C) Identify at least 5 specific locations in the District where the
installation of at least 500 square feet of solar canopies can feasibly be installed during Fiscal Year
2027.
“(b) Beginning January 1, 2027:
“(1) The multiyear capital improvement plan proposed by the Mayor in the annual
budget pursuant to § 47–339.01(a) shall, for any project encompassing any of the locations
identified in subsection (a)(1) of this section, include funding sufficient to support the installation
of solar canopies; and
“(2) DOEE may issue grants to private entities to support the installation of solar
canopies on private property in settings recommended by the study as described in subsection
(a)(1)(C).
“(c)(1) No later than September 30, 2028, DOEE shall publish an updated study analyzing
the outcomes of any solar canopies installed at locations identified in the original study.
“(2) The updated study conducted pursuant to this subsection shall:
“(A) Update the comparison of factors described in subsection (a)(2)(A) of
this section;
“(B) Identify locations, based on the updated comparison described in
subparagraph (A), where the District should require the installation of other solar canopies in
public and private settings;
“(C) Recommend financial incentives, including grants and tax exemptions,
to facilitate the installation of solar canopies; and


“(D) Describe any regulatory, administrative, or legislative changes that
would expedite or facilitate the installation of solar canopies across the District.
“(d) Beginning January 1, 2030, every new capital project included in the capital
improvement plan for which the installation of solar canopies is possible shall provide for the
installation of solar canopies on some portion or portions of the capital project’s footprint.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
100 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
101 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
102 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
103 Columbia Register.